New York, session 2025-2026, A11458.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Investigators employed by the office of the corporation counsel of 4 the city of Yonkers; provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision 5 shall be deemed to authorize such investigators to carry, possess, 6 repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor 7 has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14796-01-6